Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 2

Construction of County Highways, Roads and Bridges

54-9-201. Bonds issued — State aid pledged.

Any county may authorize the issuance of bonds pursuant to title 9, chapter 21, for the construction of county highways, roads and bridges and may irrevocably pledge, during each fiscal year, moneys received by way of state aid grants for rural roads, an amount not exceeding fifty percent (50%) of state aid funds derived from the distribution of the gasoline tax for rural roads, to the retirement of principal of and interest on the bonds, but in computing the amount of state grants, state funds used in matching federal funds shall be excluded.

Acts 1959, ch. 320, § 1; 1961, ch. 282, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A., § 54-844; Acts 1980, ch. 601, § 16; 1983, ch. 320, § 6; 1988, ch. 750, § 55.

Cross-References. Maximum effective rates of interest, § 47-14-103.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Bridges, § 5.

Collateral References. Bonds
1 et seq.

Bridges
1 et seq.

Counties
149 et seq.

Highways
1 et seq.

54-9-202. Surveys and plans of proposed projects — Contents — Approval by county — Reviewed and approved by state — Adoption by county legislative body.

Prior to the issuance of bonds, the county highway department shall prepare, or cause to be prepared, surveys and plans of proposed county highways, roads and bridges, or proposed project or projects, to be constructed, showing the location, design and construction of the proposed improvement project and the estimated cost of the project, based on current costs. When the surveys and plans have been approved by the county highway department, they shall be submitted to the department of transportation. They shall be reviewed by the department for feasibility, practicability and completeness as to design and type of construction for a permanent county highway, road or bridge improvement, in accordance with the established standards for state-aid highways and roads constructed under the state-aid highway program. If the department approves the surveys and plans, it shall certify its approval to the presiding officer of the county legislative body, who shall submit the the surveys and plans for approval or disapproval to the county legislative body at either a regular or called session to be held not less than thirty (30) nor more than forty-five (45) days from the date of submission.

Within five (5) days after the receipt of the surveys and plans, as certified by the department, the presiding officer of the county legislative body shall appoint a committee of no less than three (3), nor more than nine (9) members of the county legislative body, for the purpose of studying the surveys and plans, so that the committee may recommend approval or disapproval to the county legislative body. Within ten (10) days, the committee shall reduce its recommendations to writing and file them with the county clerk. Both majority and minority reports may be filed. At the meeting of the county legislative body, the plans, surveys, certification by the department and the recommendations of the committee appointed by the presiding officer shall be considered. If a majority of the authorized membership of the county legislative body approves, a resolution allowing the issuance of bonds, in accordance with this chapter, may be adopted. The county shall have no authority to change or alter, in any way, the surveys and plans approved and certified by the department, unless approved by the department.

Acts 1959, ch. 320, § 2; 1961, ch. 282, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 54-845; Acts 1983, ch. 320, § 7.

54-9-203. Bond resolution, contents.

The bond resolution shall contain:

The amount, or maximum amount, of the bonds to be issued;

The purpose of the bond issued being for the construction of county highways, roads or bridges, as certified by the department;

The rate, or maximum rate, of interest that the bonds shall yield; and

A concise statement as to the amount or percentage of state aid funds to be irrevocably pledged and whether the taxing power of the county shall be pledged for the payment of bonds, plus interest; but the amount irrevocably pledged from state aid funds, derived from the proceeds of the gasoline tax distributed to the counties, shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the state aid funds.

Acts 1959, ch. 320, § 3; T.C.A., § 54-846; Acts 1983, ch. 320, § 8.

54-9-204. County highway bond account — Expenditure of funds.

In accordance with the bond resolution, the county trustee shall place in a special account, known as the county highway bond account, the amounts of state-aid road funds and state aid funds received for county highway purposes, but not exceeding fifty percent (50%) of the state aid funds, pledged to the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds. The funds shall be expended for no other purpose. When an amount has been accumulated sufficient to pay the principal amount of the bonds, plus interest, the county trustee shall not place additional funds in the account.

Acts 1959, ch. 320, § 4; T.C.A., § 54-847; Acts 1983, ch. 320, § 9; 1988, ch. 750, § 56.

54-9-205 — 54-9-208. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 54-9-205 — 54-9-208 (Acts 1959, ch. 320, §§ 5-8; 1961, ch. 282, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 54-848 — 54-851), concerning payment of bonds and interest, etc., were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 57.

54-9-209. County highway department authorized to undertake project — Project accomplished by contract — Advertisement for bids.

After the sale of the bonds for the construction of the approved projects, the county legislative body may authorize the county highway department to undertake one (1) or more of the projects or may direct that the project or projects be accomplished by contract.

In the event the county highway department undertakes the project or projects, the procedures set for and the provisions of § 54-9-202 shall be applicable, and it shall be the duty of the appropriate officials in the county to explicitly follow the surveys and plans approved by the department of transportation and they shall have no authority to change, alter, or modify them in any way.

In the event the county legislative body determines the projects shall be accomplished by contract, the county, through a committee consisting of the fiscal officer of the county, the chief administrative officer of the county highway department and the county trustee, shall advertise for bids for the construction project or projects.

The advertisement shall be placed at least once weekly for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper having general circulation in the county, and shall concisely contain:

The time and date for filing sealed bids with the county clerk;

The time on the same date when the committee shall publicly open the bids;

A general description of the project or projects upon which bids will be received;

The offices of the county officials in which copies of the plans, specifications and contracts may be reviewed; and

Other pertinent information.

Acts 1959, ch. 320, § 9; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 22, 36; T.C.A., § 54-852; Acts 1983, ch. 320, § 10.

Cross-References. Advisory committee for use of the Internet, title 12, ch. 3, part 11.

Distributing and posting solicitations and responses electronically, § 12-3-1004.

54-9-210. Contract and performance bond — Acceptance of lowest bid — Rejection of bids — Readvertisement.

The department of transportation shall prepare a model contract and performance bond, which the counties, without exception, alteration or modification, shall use, except for filling in appropriate blanks, or spaces, as may be necessary to complete the contract and bond.

The bond shall be executed by a corporate surety authorized to do business in this state.

The committee referred to in § 54-9-209 shall accept, on behalf of the county, the lowest bid, except the committee may reject all bids if the lowest bid exceeds the estimated cost of the project by ten percent (10%); provided, that in the event the committee decides to reject the bid, the presiding officer of the county legislative body shall, within ten (10) days, call the county legislative body into special session to determine whether the bid shall be accepted or rejected.

If the bid is accepted either by the committee or the county legislative body, the contract shall be executed on behalf of the county, by the chief administrative officer of the county highway department, if any, and the presiding officer of the county legislative body, and countersigned by the county clerk, who shall affix the county clerk's seal of office to the contract.

If the county legislative body concurs with the committee in rejecting the bid, the project shall be readvertised in the same way and manner as originally and the low bid shall be accepted and the appropriate county officers shall execute the contract.

The original contract shall be filed in the office of the county clerk, and copies of the contract shall be supplied to the contractor and the county highway department.

Acts 1959, ch. 320, § 10; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 54-853; Acts 1983, ch. 320, § 11.

Cross-References. Advisory committee for use of the Internet, title 12, ch. 3, part 11.

Distributing and posting solicitations and responses electronically, § 12-3-1004.

54-9-211. Inspection by department of transportation — Payments to contractor.

From time to time the department of transportation shall inspect the work as it progresses on the project.

On all county road and highway projects, the contractor shall be entitled to payments on account of the contractor's contract in the same way and manner as payments are made to contractors performing state highway contracts, but no payments shall be made until the state engineer certifies that the work of the contractor, for which the contractor claims payment, has been satisfactorily performed in accordance with the contract.

Acts 1959, ch. 320, § 11; T.C.A., § 54-854; Acts 1983, ch. 320, § 12.

54-9-212. Contractor to furnish evidence of payment in full for materials and labor — Notice of settlement by publication — Claims filed.

Before final acceptance of the project as having been finally completed, the contractor shall furnish evidence to the chief administrative officer of the county highway department, if any, and/or the chief fiscal officer of the county, that all the materials used by the contractor, or the contractor's subcontractors or agents, have been fully paid for and all laborers and other employees working for the contractor, or the contractor's subcontractors or agents, have been fully paid.

When this is done, full settlement may be made with the contractor, but not until thirty (30) days' notice in some newspaper published in the county where the work is done, if there is a newspaper published there, and if not, in a newspaper in an adjoining county, that settlement is about to be made and notifying all claimants to file notice of their claims with the officials, and the period for filing shall not be less than thirty (30) days after the last published notice.

In the event claims are filed, the officials shall withhold a sufficient sum to pay the claims in the same way and manner as is provided for claimants making claims against contractors dealing with the department of transportation in accordance with § 54-5-123, and claimants may bring suits against contractors in the way and manner provided in § 54-5-124, as suits are brought against contractors dealing with the department. Where claims are allowed by the courts, §§ 54-5-126 and 54-5-127 shall be applicable.

Acts 1959, ch. 320, § 12; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-855; Acts 1983, ch. 320, § 13.